Louisiana, session 2026, HB100.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:99.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§99.3. Felony speeding
A. Felony speeding is the operation of a motor vehicle when the speed of the
vehicle exceeds the posted speed limit by at least thirty miles per hour.
B. Whoever commits the crime of felony speeding shall be fined not less
than one thousand dollars or imprisoned with or without hard labor for not less than
six months, or both.